New Jersey, session 222, A4578.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    N.J.S.40A:10-23 is amended to read as follows: 40A:10-23.  a.  Retired employees shall be required to pay for the entire cost of coverage for themselves and their dependents at rates which are deemed to be adequate to cover the benefits, as affected by Medicare, of the retired employees and their dependents on the basis of the utilization of services which may be reasonably expected of the older age classification; provided, however, that the total rate payable by a retired employee for himself and his dependents, for coverage under the contract and for Part B of Medicare, shall not exceed by more than 25% the total amount that would have been required to have been paid by the employee and his employer for the coverage maintained had he continued in office or active employment and he and his dependents were not eligible for Medicare benefits. The employer may, in its discretion, assume the entire cost or a portion of the cost of such coverage and pay all or a portion of the premiums for employees a. who have retired on a disability pension, or b. who have retired after 25 years or more of service credit in a State or locally administered retirement system and a period of service of up to 25 years with the employer at the time of retirement, such period of service to be determined by the employer and set forth in an ordinance or resolution as appropriate, or c. who have retired and reached the age of 65 years or older with 25 years or more of service credit in a State or locally administered retirement system and a period of service of up to 25 years with the employer at the time of retirement, such period of service to be determined by the employer and set forth in an ordinance or resolution as appropriate, or d. who have retired and reached the age of 62 years or older with at least 15 years of service with the employer, including the premiums on their dependents, if any, under uniform conditions as the governing body of the local unit shall prescribe.  The period of time a county law enforcement officer has been employed by any county or municipal police department, sheriff's department or county prosecutor's office, may be counted cumulatively as "service with the employer" for the purpose of qualifying for payment of health insurance premiums by the county pursuant to this section. b.  An employee who becomes a member of a State or locally-administered retirement system on or after the effective date of P.L.2010, c.2 shall pay in retirement 1.5 percent of the retiree's monthly retirement allowance, including any future cost-of-living adjustments, through the withholding of the contribution from the monthly retirement allowance, for health care benefits coverage provided under N.J.S.40A:10-22, notwithstanding any other amount that may be required additionally by the employer or through a collective negotiations agreement for such coverage.  This subsection shall apply also when the health care benefits coverage is provided through an insurance fund or joint insurance fund or in any other manner.  This subsection shall apply to any agency, board, commission, authority, or instrumentality of a local unit. c.     (1) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, if an employee qualifies for employer-paid health benefits coverage in retirement and was employed during the employees years of service by more than one State or local government entity or an institution of higher education, or is a retirant of a State-administered retirement system, the cost of the employer share for such coverage shall be paid on a pro rata basis by each former employer, commensurate with the period of employment with the employer. (2)  This section shall not be construed to require local government entities which have not opted to provide employer-paid health benefits coverage in retirement to contribute to the cost of such coverage for a retiree. (3) This section shall not be construed to alter any applicable binding collective negotiations agreement in effect prior to the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill). (cf: P.L.2010, c.2, s.15) 2.    Section 6 of P.L.1996, c.8 (C.52:14-17.28b) is amended to read as follows: 6. a. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the obligations of the State or an independent State authority, board, commission, corporation, agency, or organization to pay the premium or periodic charges for health benefits coverage provided under P.L.1961, c.49 (C.52:14-17.25 et seq.) may be determined by means of a binding collective negotiations agreement, including any agreements in force at the time of the adoption of P.L.1996, c.8. With respect to State employees for whom there is no majority representative for collective negotiations purposes, the commission may, in its sole discretion, modify the respective payment obligations set forth in P.L.1961, c.49 for the State and such employees in a manner consistent with the terms of any collective negotiations agreement binding on the State. With respect to employees of an independent State authority, board, commission, corporation, agency, or organization for whom there is no majority representative for collective negotiations purposes, the employer may, in its sole discretion, modify the respective payment obligations set forth in P.L.1961, c.49 for such employer and such employees in a manner consistent with the terms of any collective negotiations agreement binding on such employer. The provisions of this subsection shall also apply to employees deemed or considered to be employees of the State pursuant to subsection (c) of section 2 of P.L.1961, c.49 (C.52:14-17.26). b. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, for each State employee who accrues 25 years of nonconcurrent service credit in one or more State or locally-administered retirement systems before July 1, 1997, excepting the employee who elects deferred retirement, the State, upon the employee's retirement, shall pay the full cost of the premium or periodic charges for the health benefits provided to a retired State employee and dependents covered under the State Health Benefits Program, but not including survivors, and shall also reimburse the retired employee for premium charges under Part B of Medicare covering the retired employee and the employee's spouse. (2)   Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, and except as otherwise provided by section 8 of P.L.1961, c.49 (C.52:14-17.32) as amended by P.L.2005, c.341, and by subsection c. of this section, for each State employee who accrues 25 years of nonconcurrent service credit in one or more State or locally-administered retirement systems on or after July 1, 1997, excepting the employee who elects deferred retirement, the State, upon the employee's retirement, shall pay the premium or periodic charges for the health benefits provided to a retired State employee and dependents covered under the State Health Benefits Program, but not including survivors, and shall reimburse the retired employee for premium charges under Part B of Medicare covering the retired employee and the employee's spouse: (a) in accordance with the provisions, if any, concerning health benefits coverage in retirement which are in the collective negotiations agreement applicable to the employee at the time of the employee's accrual of 25 years of nonconcurrent service credit in one or more State or locally-administered retirement systems, or (b) if the employee has no majority representative for collective negotiations purposes, in a manner consistent with the terms, if any, concerning health benefits coverage in retirement which are in any collective negotiations agreement deemed applicable by the State Health Benefits Commission to that employee at the time of the employee's accrual of 25 years of nonconcurrent service credit in one or more State or locally-administered retirement systems. The terms for the payment of premiums or periodic charges established pursuant to this paragraph for the traditional plan shall apply to the successor plan, and the terms for the payment of premiums or periodic charges established pursuant to this paragraph for the NJ PLUS plan shall apply to the State managed care plan required to be included in a contract entered into pursuant to subsection c. of section 4 of P.L.1961, c.49 (C.52:14-17.28). c. (1) Effective July 1, 2007, but, with respect to employees to whom this subsection applies who are paid through the State centralized payroll, effective with the first pay period beginning after July 1, 2007, the cost of benefits provided pursuant to P.L.1961, c.49 (C.52:14-17.25 et seq.) shall be shared by employees through the withholding of a contribution in an amount as determined in accordance with paragraph (2) of this subsection. (2)   The amount of the contribution required pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection as to State employees and employees of an independent State authority, board, commission, corporation, agency, or organization for whom there is a majority representative for collective negotiations purposes shall be determined by means of a binding collective negotiations agreement.  Commencing on the effective date of P.L.2010, c.2 and upon the expiration of any applicable binding collective negotiations agreement in force on that effective date, the amount of the contribution required pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection by State employees and employees of an independent State authority, board, commission, corporation, agency, or organization for whom there is a majority representative for collective negotiations purposes shall be 1.5% of base salary, notwithstanding any other amount that may be required additionally pursuant to this paragraph by means of a binding collective negotiations agreement. The amount of the contribution required pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection as to State employees for whom there is no majority representative for collective negotiations purposes shall be determined in a manner consistent with the terms, if any, concerning health benefits coverage which are in a collective negotiations agreement deemed applicable by the commission to the employee.  The amount of the contribution required pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection as to employees of an independent State authority, board, commission, corporation, agency, or organization for whom there is no majority representative for collective negotiations purposes shall be determined in a manner consistent with the terms, if any, concerning health benefits coverage which are in a collective negotiations agreement deemed applicable by the employer to the employee.  The amount of the contribution required pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection as to State employees or employees of an independent State authority, board, commission, corporation, agency, or organization for whom there is no majority representative for collective negotiations purposes shall be 1.5 percent of base salary, notwithstanding any other amount that may be required additionally pursuant to this paragraph by means of the application of the terms of a binding collective negotiations agreement. (3)   Except as provided in paragraph (5) of this subsection, the cost of benefits provided pursuant to P.L.1961, c.49 (C.52:14-17.25 et seq.) shall be shared by retirees to whom this subsection applies through the withholding of a contribution in an amount as determined in accordance with paragraph (4) of this subsection. (4)   The amount of the contribution required pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subsection as to State employees and employees of an independent State authority, board, commission, corporation, agency, or organization for whom there is a majority representative for collective negotiations purposes who accrue 25 years of nonconcurrent service credit in one or more State or locally-administered retirement systems on or after July 1, 2007, and who retire on or after July, 1, 2007, excepting employees who elect deferred retirement, but including those who retire on a disability pension after July 1, 2007, shall be determined by means of a binding collective negotiations agreement applicable at the time of the employee's accrual of 25 years of nonconcurrent service credit in one or more State or locally-administered retirement systems. The amount of the contribution required pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subsection as to State employees or employees of an independent State authority, board, commission, corporation, agency, or organization for whom there is no majority representative for collective negotiations purposes who accrue 25 years of nonconcurrent service credit in one or more State or locally-administered retirement systems on or after July 1, 2007, and who retire on or after July 1, 2007, excepting employees who elect deferred retirement, but including those who retire on a disability pension after July 1, 2007, shall be determined in a manner consistent with the terms, if any, concerning health benefits coverage in retirement which are in any collective negotiations agreement deemed applicable by the commission to that employee at the time of the employee's accrual of 25 years of nonconcurrent service credit in one or more State or locally-administered retirement systems, except that for employees who accrue 25 years of nonconcurrent service credit in one or more State or locally-administered retirement systems in the period beginning July 1, 2007, and ending June 30, 2011, the contribution shall be 1.5 percent of the monthly retirement allowance, including any future cost-of-living adjustments, or, with respect to retirees for whom there is no majority representative and who are members of the alternate benefit program, an amount determined pursuant to a formula developed by the commission that shall be designed to result in a contribution that is comparable to the contribution that applies to retirees who are not members of the alternate benefit program. (5)   The contribution required pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subsection shall not take effect until the New Jersey Retirees' Wellness Program is open for enrollment and thereafter the contribution shall be waived for a retiree who participates in the New Jersey Retirees' Wellness Program. The Division of Pensions and Benefits shall issue a report on the New Jersey Retirees' Wellness Program. The report shall include, but need not be limited to, the claims experience with regard to retirees in the program, and the costs and savings realized. The report shall be issued at the end of the third year after the program's implementation or by December 30, 2010, whichever is earlier. The report shall be submitted to the Governor, the Legislature, and the State Treasurer. (6)   Any employee or retiree from whom withholding of a contribution is required pursuant to this subsection shall not be required to pay any percentage of the premiums or periodic charges for health care benefits provided under P.L.1961, c.49 (C.52:14-17.25 et seq.), other than dental benefits. (7)   The contribution required pursuant to this subsection may be terminated only upon withdrawal from all health care benefits coverage as an employee or retiree, other than coverage for dental benefits, and the submission to the commission of written certification by the employee that the employee is covered by other health care benefits and that those benefits are in force. The commission shall not apply the written certification requirement to retirees or to employees to whom Article VI, Section VI, paragraph 6 of the New Jersey Constitution applies. d.    The amount of contribution required pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection c. of this section in retirement as to a State employee and employee of an independent State authority, board, commission, corporation, agency, or organization who becomes a member of a State or locally-administered retirement system on or after the effective date of P.L.2010, c.2, for whom there is a majority representative for collective negotiations purposes and for whom there is no such representative, shall be 1.5 percent of the retiree's monthly retirement allowance, including any future cost-of-living adjustments, or with respect to members of the alternate benefit program, an amount determined pursuant to the formula specified in paragraph (4) of subsection c. of this section, notwithstanding any other amount that may be required additionally pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection c. of this section by means of a binding collective negotiations agreement or by means of the application of the terms of such an agreement.  The contribution required by this subsection or pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection c. of this section for officers or employees specified in this subsection shall not be waived for a retiree who participates in the New Jersey Retirees' Wellness Program. e.     (1) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, if an employee qualifies for employer-paid health benefits coverage in retirement and was employed during the employees years of service by more than one State or local government entity or an institution of higher education, or is a retirant of a State-administered retirement system, the cost of the employer share for such coverage shall be paid on a pro rata basis by each former employer, commensurate with the period of employment with the employer. (2)  This section shall not be construed to require local government entities which have not opted to provide employer-paid health benefits coverage in retirement to contribute to the cost of such coverage for a retiree. (3) This section shall not be construed to alter any applicable binding collective negotiations agreement in effect prior to the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill). (cf: P.L.2010, c.2, s.1) 3.    Section 39 of P.L.2007, c.103 (C.52:14-17.46.9) is amended to read as follows: 39. a. For each active covered employee and for the eligible dependents the employee may have enrolled at the employee's option, from funds appropriated therefor, the employer shall pay to the commission the premium or periodic charges for the benefits provided under the contract in amounts equal to the premium or periodic charges for the benefits provided under such a contract covering the employee and the employee's enrolled dependents. b.    The obligations of any employer to pay the premium or periodic charges for health benefits coverage provided under the School Employees' Health Benefits Program Act, sections 31 through 41 of P.L.2007, c.103 (C.52:14-17.46.1 through C.52:14-17.46.11), may be determined by means of a binding collective negotiations agreement, including any agreement in force at the time the employer commences participation in the School Employees' Health Benefits Program. With respect to employees for whom there is no majority representative for collective negotiations purposes, the employer may, in its sole discretion, modify the respective payment obligations set forth in law for the employer and such employees in a manner consistent with the terms of any collective negotiations agreement binding on the employer. Commencing on the effective date of P.L.2010, c.2 and upon the expiration of any applicable binding collective negotiations agreement in force on that effective date, employees shall pay 1.5 percent of base salary, through the withholding of the contribution, for health benefits coverage provided under P.L.2007, c.103 (C.52:14-17.46.1 et seq.), notwithstanding any other amount that may be required additionally pursuant to this subsection by means of a binding collective negotiations agreement or the modification of payment obligations. c.     There is hereby established a School Employee Health Benefits Program fund consisting of all contributions to premiums and periodic charges remitted to the State treasury by participating employers for employee coverage. All such contributions shall be deposited in the fund and the fund shall be used to pay the portion of the premium and periodic charges attributable to employee and dependent coverage. d.    The fund shall contain a dedicated subaccount reserved for payment of claims and other health services fees for covered health services and prescription drug benefits provided to covered employees and their enrolled eligible dependents. No person shall use or authorize the use of the assets in the subaccount, or the investment earnings thereon, for any purpose other than for the provision of benefits in accordance with the terms of the School Employees' Health Benefits Program and for defraying the reasonable costs of administering the subaccount.  A third-party medical claims reviewer, procured pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2019, c.143 (C.52:14-17.30b), shall, in the performance of services for the program, act in the best interests of the State, participating employers, and covered employees and their enrolled eligible dependents. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as subjecting the program, its plans, the State, or any participating employer to the provisions of the "Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974" (29 U.S.C. s.1001 et seq.). The third-party medical claims reviewer shall collect, store and maintain a secure archive of medical and prescription drug claims data and other health services payment information and provide such data and other reports in compliance with applicable State and federal laws, including the "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996," Pub.L.104-191, to document the cost and nature of claims incurred, demographic information on the covered population, emerging utilization and demographic trends, and such other information as may be available to assist in the governance of the program and in timely response to any requests from the Governor, the State Treasurer, the Division of Pensions and Benefits, the School Employees' Health Benefits Commission, the School Employees' Health Benefits Plan Design Committee, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the General Assembly. Such claims data shall include, but not be limited to, for each claim, the claim number, provider information, amount charged, amount paid, and the Current Procedural Terminology (CPT) code. The School Employees' Health Benefits Commission, the School Employees' Health Benefits Plan Design Committee, the State Treasurer, or the Division of Pensions and Benefits may direct the third-party medical claims reviewer to provide appropriate medical and prescription drug claims and other health services payment data to a health care services provider or other authorized entity, in compliance with applicable State and federal laws, including the "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996," Pub.L.104-191, for the specific purpose of improving the quality and value of health care services delivered to program participants. The State Treasurer shall deposit into the subaccount the moneys necessary to accomplish the purposes of this subsection, including moneys paid by employers participating in the program, and contributed by covered employees and retirees.  Deposits and contributions to the subaccount shall be applied to the distribution of payments for the costs of health care services and prescription drug benefits and to fund the reasonable costs of administering the subaccount. Assets in the subaccount shall be expended or withdrawn, and deposits and withdrawals shall be reconciled, in accordance with regulations and procedures adopted pursuant to this subsection. Moneys in the subaccount shall be invested in permitted investments or shall be held in interest-bearing accounts in such depositories as the State Treasurer may select, and may be invested and reinvested in permitted investments or invested and reinvested in the same manner as other accounts in the custody of the State Treasurer as provided by law. All interest or other income or earnings derived from the investment or reinvestment of moneys in the subaccount shall be credited thereto and shall be determined on an aggregate basis for all participating employers. The State Treasurer shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), such rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act, P.L.2019, c.143 (C.52:14-17.30a et al.). e.     Notwithstanding any law to the contrary and except as provided by amendment by P.L.2010, c.2, and by P.L.2011, c.78, the payment in full of premium or periodic charges for eligible retirees and their dependents pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1987, c.384 (C.52:14-17.32f), section 2 of P.L.1992, c.126 (C.52:14-17.32f1), or section 1 of P.L.1995, c.357 (C.52:14-17.32f2) shall be continued without alteration or interruption and there shall be no premium sharing or periodic charges for certain school employees in retirement once they have met the criteria for vesting for pension benefits, which criteria for purposes of this subsection only shall mean the criteria for vesting in the Teachers' Pension and Annuity Fund. For purposes of this subsection, "premium sharing or periodic charges" shall mean payments by eligible retirees based upon a proportion of the premiums for health care benefits. f.     (1) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, if an employee qualifies for employer-paid health benefits coverage in retirement and was employed during the employees years of service by more than one State or local government entity or an institution of higher education, or is a retirant of a State-administered retirement system, the cost of the employer share for such coverage shall be paid on a pro rata basis by each former employer, commensurate with the period of employment with the employer. (2)  This section shall not be construed to require local government entities which have not opted to provide employer-paid health benefits coverage in retirement to contribute to the cost of such coverage for a retiree. (3) This section shall not be construed to alter any applicable binding collective negotiations agreement in effect prior to the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill). (cf: P.L.2019, c.143, s.6) 4.    This act shall take effect 180 days after the date of enactment.  The State Treasurer may take any anticipatory action necessary prior to the effective date to implement the provisions of this act.